Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.136

Records and information.

(1) A limited liability company must keep at its principal office the following:

(a) A copy of its certificate of formation and all amendments thereto;

(b) A copy of any limited liability company agreement made in a record and any amendments made in a record to a limited liability company agreement;

(c) Unless contained in its certificate of formation, a statement in a record of:

(i) The amount of cash and a description and statement of the agreed value of the other benefits contributed and agreed to be contributed by each member;

(ii) The times at which or events on the happening of which any additional contributions agreed to be made by each member are to be made;

(iii) Any right of any member to receive distributions which include a return of all or any part of the member's contribution; and

(iv) Any events upon the happening of which the limited liability company is to be dissolved and its activities wound up;

(d) A copy of the limited liability company's federal, state, and local tax returns and reports, if any, for the three most recent years;

(e) A copy of any financial statements of the limited liability company for the three most recent years;

(f) A copy of any record made by the limited liability company during the past three years of any consent given by or vote taken of any member pursuant to this chapter or the limited liability company agreement;

(g) A copy of the three most recent annual reports delivered by the limited liability company to the secretary of state pursuant to RCW 25.15.106;

(h) A copy of any filed articles of conversion or merger; and

(i) A copy of any certificate of dissolution or certificate of revocation of dissolution.

(2) On ten days' demand, made in a record received by the limited liability company, a member may inspect and copy, during regular business hours at the limited liability company's principal office, the records required by subsection (1) of this section to be kept by a limited liability company. The member need not have any particular purpose for seeking the records. However, if the records contain information specified in subsection (3)(a) of this section, the limited liability company may substitute copies of the records that are redacted to protect information specified in subsection (3)(a) of this section, unless the member meets the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.

(3) During regular business hours and at a reasonable location specified by the limited liability company, a member may inspect and copy the following records of the limited liability company if the member meets the requirements of subsection (4) of this section:

(a) A current and a past list, setting forth the full name and last known mailing address of each member and manager, if any;

(b) Excerpts from any meeting of the managers or members, and records of limited liability company action approved by the members or manager without a meeting; and

(c) Accounting records of the limited liability company.

(4) A member may inspect and copy the records described in subsection (3) of this section if:

(a) The member seeks the records for a purpose reasonably related to the member's interest in the limited liability company;

(b) The member makes a demand in a record received by the limited liability company, describing with reasonable particularity the records sought and the purpose for seeking the records; and

(c) The records sought are directly connected to the member's purpose.

(5) Within ten days after receiving a demand pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the limited liability company in a record must inform the member that made the demand:

(a) What records the limited liability company will provide in response to the demand;

(b) When and where the limited liability company will provide the records; and

(c) If the limited liability company declines to provide any demanded records, the limited liability company's reasons for declining.

(6) A person dissociated as a member may inspect and copy the records required by subsection (1) of this section during regular business hours in the limited liability company's principal office if:

(a) The records pertain to the period during which the person was a member or transferee;

(b) The person seeks the records in good faith; and

(c) The person meets the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.

(7) The limited liability company must respond to a demand made pursuant to subsection (6) of this section in the same manner as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

(8) The limited liability company may impose reasonable restrictions on the use of records and information obtained under this section.

(9) A limited liability company may charge a person that makes a demand under this section reasonable costs of copying, limited to the costs of labor and material.

(10) A member, or a person dissociated as a member, may exercise the rights under this section through an attorney or other agent. Any restriction imposed under subsection (8) of this section or by the limited liability company agreement applies both to the attorney or other agent and to the member or person dissociated as a member.

(11) The rights stated in this section do not extend to a person as transferee, but the rights under subsections (2) and (3) of this section may be exercised by a deceased member's personal representative for purposes of settling the estate, or by the legal representative of an individual under legal disability who is dissociated as a member pursuant to RCW 25.15.131(1)(f).

(12) Each manager, or each member of the manager if the manager is a board, committee, or other group of persons, without having any particular purpose for seeking the information, may inspect and copy during regular business hours:

(a) At the limited liability company's principal office, the records required by subsection (1) of this section; and

(b) At a reasonable location specified by the limited liability company, any other records maintained by the limited liability company regarding the limited liability company's activities and financial condition, or that otherwise relate to the management of the limited liability company.

(13) Any action to enforce any right arising under this section must be brought in the superior courts.

[ 2015 c 188 s 29.]